Utah statutes.
13-1-8.5.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

(1)  The Department of Commerce and its divisions shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.

(2)  The department may contract with other state agencies or departments to conduct hearings in its name or in the name of its divisions or agencies.

